Vermont, session 2025-2026, H869.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 731 is amended to read:
§ 731. VACANCY ON UNIFIED UNION SCHOOL DISTRICT BOARD
(a) Filling a vacancy. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, this section shall apply to a vacancy on a unified union school district
VT LEG #386189 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.869
2026 Page 2 of 4
board, unless otherwise provided in the articles of agreement of the district as
initially approved by the voters on or before July 1, 2019.
(1) Proportional to town population. If the vacancy is for a seat where
membership is apportioned to a town within the unified union school district in
a number that is closely proportional to the town’s relative population and only
voters residing in the town elect the board member, then the clerk of the
unified union school district shall notify the selectboard of the town not later
than five days after learning of the vacancy. Within 30 days after providing
notice and after consultation with the selectboard, the unified union school
district board shall appoint an eligible person chosen by the selectboard of the
town to fill the vacancy until the voters elect a successor at an annual or special
meeting for the remainder of the term.
(2) Modified at-large model: allocation to town; at-large representation.
If the vacancy is for a seat where membership is allocated to a town within the
unified union school district in a number that is not closely proportional to
each town’s relative population and the board member is elected at large, then
the district clerk shall notify the selectboard of the town not later than five days
after learning of the vacancy. Within 30 days after providing notice and after
consultation with the selectboard, the unified union school district board shall
appoint an eligible person chosen by the selectboard of the town to fill the
VT LEG #386189 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.869
2026 Page 3 of 4
vacancy until the voters elect a successor at an annual or special meeting for
the remainder of the term.
* * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 749 is amended to read:
§ 749. VACANCY ON UNION ELEMENTARY OR UNION HIGH
SCHOOL DISTRICT BOARD
(a) Filling a vacancy. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the
contrary, this section shall apply to a vacancy on a union elementary or union
high school district board, unless otherwise provided in the articles of
agreement of the union elementary or union high school district as initially
approved by the voters on or before July 1, 2019.
* * *
(4) No board of member district. For purposes of subdivisions (1)
(proportional to town population) and (2) (modified at-large) of this subsection
(a), if the member district is also a union school district and any related town
school district has discontinued operations pursuant to subdivision 717(b)(2)
(discontinuation of forming districts in union elementary and union high
school districts) of this chapter and has no board, then the clerk of the union
elementary or union high school district shall notify the selectboard of the
pertinent town not later than five days after learning of the vacancy. Within 30
days after providing notice and after consultation with the selectboard, the
VT LEG #386189 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.869
2026 Page 4 of 4
union elementary or union high school district board shall appoint a person
who is otherwise eligible to serve as a member of the union elementary or
union high school district board and who is chosen by the selectboard to fill the
vacancy until the voters elect a successor at an annual or special meeting
pursuant to the provisions of section 748 (union elementary and union high
school district board members) of this chapter for the remainder of the term.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386189 v.1